Utah statutes.
76-8-305.5.   Failure to stop at the command of a law enforcement officer.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who flees from or otherwise attempts to elude a law enforcement officer:

(1)  after the officer has issued a verbal or visual command to stop;

(2)  for the purpose of avoiding arrest; and

(3)  by any means other than a violation of Section 41-6a-210 regarding failure to stop a vehicle at the command of a law enforcement officer.

